Utah statutes.
58-50-9.   Standards of conduct for private probation providers.

The private probation provider:

(1)  shall maintain impartiality toward all parties;

(2)  shall ensure that all parties understand the nature of the process, the procedure, the particular role of the private probation provider, and the parties' relationship to the private probation provider;

(3)  shall maintain confidentiality or, in cases where confidentiality is not protected, the private probation provider shall so advise the parties;

(4)  shall disclose any circumstance that may create or give the appearance of a conflict of interest and any circumstance that may reasonably raise a question as to the private probation provider's impartiality; if the contract probation supervisor perceives or believes a conflict of interest to exist, the contract probation supervisor shall refrain from entering into those probation services;

(5)  shall adhere to the standards regarding private probation services adopted by the licensing board;

(6)  shall comply with orders of court and perform services as directed by judges in individual cases;

(7)  shall perform duties established under Section 77-18-1, as ordered by the court.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 352, 1995 General Session

